better-hyphenation.dic
.kähe1dal.
.soo1last.
.kus1kile.
.küm1nele.
.leid1sid.
.kur1jale.
.lai1guke.
.pais1tis.
.puh1taks.
.keer1les.
.kan1nast.
.saa1pale.
.Ime1väel.
.nohi1ses.
.sat1side.
.kal1dale.
.vedi1nud.
.pil1kude.
.kodu1maa.
.nuri1nad.
.väli1mus.
